Wyoming statutes. Title 16 City, County, State and Local Powers
Article 2. Public Records

Cross references. —

As to filing of documents, see art. 3 of this chapter.

As to stealing or altering public records, see §

6-3-604

.

As to public records in regard to state library and state archives, museums and historical department, see §§

9-2-405

through

9-2-413

and

9-2-419

.

Cited

in

Laramie River Conservation Council v. Industrial Siting Council, 588 P.2d 1241,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 254

(Wyo. 1978).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Constitutional Law — A Constitutional Right of Access to State-Held Information. Sheridan Newspapers, Inc. v. City of Sheridan, 660 P.2d 785,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1983),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 719 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, and application of statutory provisions relating to public access to police records, 82 ALR3d 19.

Power of court under 5 USC § 552(a)(4)(B) to examine agency records in camera to determine propriety of withholding records, 60 ALR Fed 416.

What are administrative staff manuals and instructions to staff that affect members of public that must be disclosed under the Freedom of Information Act (FOIA) (5 USCS § 552(a)(2)(C)), 139 ALR Fed 299.

§ 16-4-201.
Definitions; short title; designation of ombudsman.

As used in this act:

“Custodian” means the official custodian or any authorized person having personal custody and control of the public records in question;

“Official custodian” means any officer or employee of a governmental entity, who is responsible for the maintenance, care and keeping of public records, regardless of whether the records are in his actual personal custody and control;

“Person in interest” means the person who is the subject of a record or any representative designated by the person, except if the subject of the record is under legal disability or is the dependent high school student of his parents, “person in interest” means the parent or duly appointed legal representative;

“Political subdivision” means every county, city and county, city, incorporated and unincorporated town, school district and special district within the state;

“Public records” when not otherwise specified includes any information in a physical form created, accepted, or obtained by a governmental entity in furtherance of its official function and transaction of public business which is not privileged or confidential by law. Without limiting the foregoing, the term “public records” includes any written communication or other information, whether in paper, electronic, or other physical form, received by a governmental entity in furtherance of the transaction of public business of the governmental entity, whether at a meeting or outside a meeting. Electronic communications solely between students attending a school in Wyoming and electronic communications solely between students attending a school in Wyoming and a sender or recipient using a nonschool user address are not a public record of that school. As used in this paragraph, a “school in Wyoming” means the University of Wyoming, any community college and any public school within a school district in the state;

Public records shall be classified as follows:

“Official public records” includes all original vouchers, receipts and other documents necessary to isolate and prove the validity of every transaction relating to the receipt, use and disposition of all public property and public income from all sources whatsoever; all agreements and contracts to which a governmental entity is a party; all fidelity, surety and performance bonds; all claims filed against a governmental entity; all records or documents required by law to be filed with or kept by a governmental entity of Wyoming; and all other documents or records determined by the records committee to be official public records;

“Office files and memoranda” includes all records, correspondence, exhibits, books, booklets, drawings, maps, blank forms, or documents not defined and classified in subparagraph (A) of this subsection as official public records; all duplicate copies of official public records filed with any governmental entity; all documents and reports made for the internal administration of the office to which they pertain but not required by law to be filed or kept with the office; and all other documents or records, determined by the records committee to be office files and memoranda.

Repealed by Laws 2012, ch. 74, § 2.

“This act” means W.S.

16-4-201

through

16-4-205

;

“Application” means a written request for a public record. However, a designated public records person may in his discretion deem a verbal request to be an application;

“Information” means opinions, facts, or data of any kind and in whatever physical form kept or maintained, including, but not limited to, written, aural, visual, electronic or other physical form;

“Peace officer recording” means any audio or video data recorded by a peace officer, as defined in W.S. 6-1-104(a)(vi), on a camera or other device which is:

Provided to or used by the peace officer in the course of the officer performing official business; and

Designed to be worn on the peace officer’s body or attached to a vehicle, as defined in W.S. 6-1-104(a)(xi), used by the officer.

“Designated public records person” means the person designated as required by W.S. 16-4-202(e) or that person’s designee;

“Governmental entity” means the state of Wyoming, an agency, political subdivision or state institution of Wyoming;

“Ombudsman” means the person designated by the governor as required by subsection (c) of this section.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Public Records Act.”

The governor shall designate an ombudsman for purposes of this act. The ombudsman shall:

Receive complaints as provided under this act;

Upon request of either party, mediate disputes between a governmental entity and an applicant for a public record;

Keep confidential all records submitted by a governmental entity;

Provide uniform interpretation and training on the ombudsman’s role and recommendations under this act to governmental entities and the general public;

Have other authority and duties as provided in this act.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 145, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-692.1; W.S. 1977, §

9-9-101

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2001, ch. 37, § 1; 2012, ch. 74, §§ 1, 2; 2016 ch. 48, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 201, § 1, effective March 13, 2017; 2019 ch. 174, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 36, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Cross references. —

Property and Casualty
Actuarial Opinions, see §

26-6-401

et seq.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, in (a)(v), substituted “any information in a physical form created, accepted, or obtained by the state or any agency, institution or political subdivision of the state in furtherance of its official function and transaction of public business which is not privileged or confidential by law” for “the original and copies of any paper, correspondence, form, book, photograph, photostat, film, microfilm, sound recording, map drawing or other document, regardless of physical form or characteristics that have been made by the state of Wyoming and any counties, municipalities and political subdivisions thereof and by any agencies of the state, counties, municipalities and political subdivisions thereof, or received by them in connection with the transaction of public business, except those privileged or confidential by law” and added the last sentence; repealed former (a)(vii), which read: “‘Writings’ means all books, papers, maps, photographs, cards, tapes, recordings or other documentary materials, regardless of physical form or characteristics”; and added (a)(ix) and (a)(x).

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, in (a)(v), added the last two sentences.

The 2017 amendment

, added (a)(xi).

Laws 2017, ch. 201, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const.
Approved March 13, 2017.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a)(ii), substituted "employee of a governmental entity" for "employee of the state or any agency, institution or political subdivision thereof," in (a)(v), substituted "a governmental entity" for "the state or any agency, institution or political subdivision of the state," throughout, in (a)(vi)(A), substituted "a governmental entity" for "the state or any agency or subdivision thereof," throughout, and "a governmental entity" for "any agency or the state," in (a)(vi)(B), substituted "any governmental entity" for "any agency of the state or subdivision thereof," in (a)(ix), substituted "designated public records person" for "custodian," and added (a)(xii) and (a)(xiii); and added (b).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added (a)(xiv) and (c).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Applicability.—

Special District Public Records and Meetings Act requires that certain documents be readily accessible for public review and providing options for ensuring that review is possible; the Act does not establish or limit the covered entities’ record retention requirements or disclosure requirements, and it is not a substitute for and does not change the applicability of the Wyoming Public Records Act. Wyo. Jet Ctr., LLC v. Jackson Hole Airport Bd., 2019 WY 6, 432 P.3d 910,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 2019).

By the Special
District Public Records and Meetings Act, the legislature included
airport joint powers boards alongside special districts, treated them
equally, and declared the Wyoming Public Records Act (WPRA) controlling;
this is a clear expression of the legislature’s understanding
and intention that all the entities subject to the Special District
Act are likewise subject to the WPRA’s disclosure requirements. Wyo. Jet Ctr., LLC v. Jackson Hole Airport Bd., 2019 WY 6, 432 P.3d 910,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 2019).

Special district.—

Jackson Hole
Airport Board was established to perform a single public service,
operation of the airport, within a specific geographic location, and
for purposes of the Wyoming Public Records Act, it is a special district. Wyo. Jet Ctr., LLC v. Jackson Hole Airport Bd., 2019 WY 6, 432 P.3d 910,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 2019).

Applicability.—

Special District Public Records and Meetings Act requires that certain documents be readily accessible for public review and providing options for ensuring that review is possible; the Act does not establish or limit the covered entities’ record retention requirements or disclosure requirements, and it is not a substitute for and does not change the applicability of the Wyoming Public Records Act. Wyo. Jet Ctr., LLC v. Jackson Hole Airport Bd., 2019 WY 6, 432 P.3d 910,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 2019).

By the Special
District Public Records and Meetings Act, the legislature included
airport joint powers boards alongside special districts, treated them
equally, and declared the Wyoming Public Records Act (WPRA) controlling;
this is a clear expression of the legislature’s understanding
and intention that all the entities subject to the Special District
Act are likewise subject to the WPRA’s disclosure requirements. Wyo. Jet Ctr., LLC v. Jackson Hole Airport Bd., 2019 WY 6, 432 P.3d 910,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 2019).

Special district.—

Jackson Hole
Airport Board was established to perform a single public service,
operation of the airport, within a specific geographic location, and
for purposes of the Wyoming Public Records Act, it is a special district. Wyo. Jet Ctr., LLC v. Jackson Hole Airport Bd., 2019 WY 6, 432 P.3d 910,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 2019).

Public records. —

It was error for the director of the Wyoming Division of Criminal Investigation to be ordered to provide a newspaper editor with a list of people possessing a permit or license to carry a concealed weapon in the county, since the records were not public. Pagel v. Franscell, 2002 WY 169, 57 P.3d 1226,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 190

(Wyo. 2002).

Public inspection of names and salaries of school districtemployees. —

In granting summary judgment in favor of a newspaper, the district court properly ruled as a matter of law that the newspaper was entitled to information concerning the names and salaries of individual employees of a school district.
Laramie County Sch. Dist. No. One v. Cheyenne Newspapers, 2011 WY 55, 250 P.3d 522,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 2011).

Tape of university committee meeting was a public record. —

Tape of a meeting of a committee regarding the misconduct of a university's former manager of transportation services should have been considered a public record because the university took possession of the tape in connection with an internal personnel investigation, which was subject to inspection by any member of the public absent the application of any statutory exemption.
Sheaffer v. State ex rel. Univ. of Wyo., 2006 WY 99, 139 P.3d 468,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 2006).

Quoted

in

Laramie River Conservation Council v. Dinger, 567 P.2d 731,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 276

(Wyo. 1977); Allsop v. Cheyenne Newspapers, Inc., 2002 WY 22, 39 P.3d 1092,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2002); Williams v. Matheny, 2017 WY 85, 398 P.3d 521,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. 2017).

Cited

in

Houghton v. Franscell, 870 P.2d 1050,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1994); Sheridan Newspapers, Inc. v. Bd. of Trs. of Sheridan Cnty. Sch. Dist. #2, 2015 WY 70,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(May 14, 2015).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Constitutional Law — A Constitutional Right of Access to State-Held Information. Sheridan Newspapers, Inc. v. City of Sheridan, 660 P.2d 785,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1983),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 719 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Accused's right to discovery or inspection of “rap sheets” or similar police records about prosecution witnesses, 10 Cal. 3d 812, 518 P.2d 1353, 1974 Cal. LEXIS 364, 112 Cal. Rptr. 257, ALR3d 820.

What constitutes a public record or document within statute making falsification, forgery, mutilation, removal or other misuse thereof an offense, 75 ALR4th 1067.

What constitutes “final opinion” or “order” of federal administrative agency required to be made available for public inspection and copying within meaning of 5 U.S.C. § 552(a)(2)(A), 114 ALR Fed 287.

What are “records” of agency which must be made available under Freedom of Information Act (5 USC § 552(a)(3)) 153 ALR Fed 571.

What constitutes “agency” for purposes of Freedom of Information Act (5 U.S.C. § 552), 165 ALR Fed 591.

Actions brought under Freedom of Information Act, 5 U.S.C. §§ 522 et seq. — Supreme Court cases, 167 ALR Fed 545.

§ 16-4-202.
Right of inspection; rules and regulations; unavailability; training.

All public records shall be open for inspection by any person at reasonable times, during business hours of the governmental entity, except as provided in this act or as otherwise provided by law, but the governmental entity may make rules and regulations with reference to the inspection of the records as is reasonably necessary for the protection of the records and the prevention of unnecessary interference with the regular discharge of the duties of the governmental entity. All applications for public records shall be made to the designated public records person.

If the public records requested are not in the custody or control of the governmental entity to whom application is made, the designated public records person shall notify the applicant within seven (7) business days from the date of acknowledged receipt of the request of the unavailability of the records sought and provide the name and contact information of the appropriate designated public records person if known.

If the public records requested are in the custody and control of the governmental entity to whom application is made,the following shall apply:

If the records are in active use or in storage, and therefore not available at the time an applicant asks to examine them, the designated public records person shall immediately forward the request to the custodian or authorized person having personal custody and control of the public records and shall notify the applicant of this situation within seven (7) business days from the date of acknowledged receipt of the request;

If a public record is readily available, it shall be released immediately to the applicant so long as the release does not impair or impede the governmental entity’s ability to discharge its other duties;

All public records shall be released not later than thirty (30) calendar days from the date of acknowledged receipt of the request unless good cause exists preventing release as authorized by paragraph (iv) of this subsection;

If good cause exists preventing release within the time period specified in paragraph (iii) of this subsection, the public records shall be released on a specified date mutually agreed to by the applicant and the governmental entity. If a release date cannot be agreed upon, the applicant may file a complaint with the ombudsman as provided by paragraph (v) of this subsection;

The applicant may at any time file a complaint with an ombudsman designated by the governor or may petition the district court for a determination as to whether the custodian has demonstrated good cause. In determining whether good cause existed, the ombudsman or district court may consider whether the records are privileged or confidential by law or whether release of the records impairs or impedes the governmental entity’s ability to discharge its other duties. The ombudsman or the district court shall review the records in camera and determine whether redaction of privileged or confidential information would permit release of the records.

If a public record exists primarily or solely in an electronic format, the custodian of the record shall so inform the requester. Electronic record inspection and copying shall be subject to the following:

The reasonable costs of producing a copy of the public record shall be borne by the party making the request. The costs may include the cost of producing a copy of the public record and the cost of constructing the record, including the cost of programming and computer services;

A governmental entity shall provide an electronic record, if requested, in alternative electronic file types unless doing so is impractical or impossible;

A governmental entity shall not be required to compile data, extract data or create a new document to comply with an electronic record request;

A governmental entity shall not be required to allow inspection or copying of a record in its electronic format if doing so would jeopardize or compromise the security or integrity of the original record or of any proprietary software in which it is maintained;

Nothing in this section shall prohibit the governor from enacting any rules pursuant to his authority under W.S. 19-13-104(c)(i).

Each governmental entity shall designate a person to receive all applications for public records. The designated public records person shall be an employee, officer, contractor or agent of the governmental entity. The governmental entity shall submit the name, business email address and business mailing address of the designated public records person to the department of administration and information for publication on the department of administration and information official website. The designated public records person shall serve as a point of contact between the governmental entity and applicants seeking public records.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 145, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 9-692.2; W.S. 1977, § 9-9-102; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 53, § 1; 2005, ch. 174, § 2; 2012, ch. 30, § 3; ch. 74, § 1; 2019 ch. 174, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 186, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 36, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Cross references. —

As to examination of books of state, county and municipal institutions, see §

9-1-507

.

As to county records open to public inspection, see §

18-3-103

.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (d)(v), substituted “state chief information officer” for “on-line government commission,” and “his” for “its.”

The 2012 amendments. —

The first 2012 amendment, by ch. 30, § 3, in (d)(v), substituted “director of the office of homeland security” for “state chief information officer”; and substituted “W.S. 19-13-104(d)(v)” for “W.S.

9-2-2501

.”

Laws 2012, ch. 30, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2012.

The second 2012 amendment, by ch. 74 § 1, effective July 1, 2012, inserted “during business hours of the state entity or political subdivision” in (a); rewrote (b), which read: “If the public records requested are not in the custody or control of the person to whom application is made, the person shall forthwith notify the applicant of this fact”; and in (c), inserted “or authorized person having personal custody and control of the public records,” and added “within seven (7) business days from the date of acknowledged receipt of the request, unless good cause exists preventing a response within such time period” and the last two sentences.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 174, § 1, effective July 1, 2019, in (a), substituted “governmental entity” or “state entity or political subdivision” and added the last sentence; in (b), substituted “control of the governmental entity” for “control of the person,” “designated public records person” for “custodian or authorized person having personal custody and control of the public records,” and “sought and provide the name and contact information of the appropriate designated public records person if known” for “sought, unless good cause exists preventing a response within such time period. In the event the applicant is not satisfied that good cause exists, the applicant may petition the district court for a determination as to whether the custodian has demonstrated good cause existed”; in the introductory language in (c), substituted “governmental entity” for “person” and “made, the following shall apply” for “made but,” designated part of existing (c) as (c)(i) and (c)(ii), in (c)(i), added “If the records” at the beginning, added “designated public records person shall immediately forward the request to the” preceding “custodian,” substituted “records and shall” for “records shall,” and deleted “unless good cause exists preventing a response within such time period. In the event the applicant is not satisfied that good cause exists, the applicant may petition the district court for a determination as to whether the custodian has demonstrated good cause existed,” in (c)(ii), substituted “governmental entity's” for “agency's,” added (c)(iii) through (c)(v), and made related changes; in (d)(ii), (d)(iii), and (d)(iv), substituted “A governmental entity” for “An agency,” and in (d)(iii), substituted “governmental entity's” for “agency's”; and added (e).

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 186, § 1, effective July 1, 2019, in (d)(v), substituted “governor” for “director of the office of homeland security” and “W.S. 19-13-104(c)(i)” for “W.S. 19-13-104(d)(v).”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a) substituted “governmental entity” for “official custodian of any public records” and “the governmental entity” for “the custodian or his office”; in (d)(ii) substituted “electronic record, if requested, in alternative electronic file types” for “electronic record in alternative formats”; in (d)(iii) deleted “if doing so would impair the governmental entity's ability to discharge its duties”; and in (e) added the second sentence.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a), see § 16-4-201(a)(viii).

Coroner's verdict and case docket sufficient.—

County coroner produced all of the information required because the coroner's verdict and case docket included a reason for the death of the decedent—blood loss resulting from gunshot wounds to the torso—and explained the injuries that caused the fatal blood loss. The coroner did not have an absolute, clear and indisputable duty to provide the detailed information requested by a party, such as additional details or diagrams when listing the cause of death. Williams v. Sundstrom, 2016 WY 122, 385 P.3d 789,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 2016).

Charges allowed.—

Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 16-4-202(d)(i) (2015) allows a public record custodian to charge for
inspection of an electronic record if the inspection request requires
production of a copy of the record. Cheyenne Newspapers, Inc. v. Bd. of Trs. Sch. Dist. No. One, 2016 WY 113, 384 P.3d 679,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. 2016).

Limitation
on the costs charged under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 16-4-202(d)(i) (2015) is that they be the reasonable costs of producing
a copy. Cheyenne Newspapers, Inc. v. Bd. of Trs. Sch. Dist. No. One, 2016 WY 113, 384 P.3d 679,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. 2016).

School district's
charge for retrieving certain school board member email communications
was appropriate given that Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 16-4-202(d)(i) allowed a public record custodian to charge for inspection
of an electronic record if the inspection request required production
of a copy of the record, and the newspaper newspaper had not challenged
the reasonableness of the charge imposed. Cheyenne Newspapers, Inc. v. Bd. of Trs. Sch. Dist. No. One, 2016 WY 113, 384 P.3d 679,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. 2016).

Applicability.—

Delay in providing
public records requested by an inmate did not amount to a denial because
(1) the Wyoming Public Records Act did not support such a notion,
(2) Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 16-4-202(c) only made correctional officials respond to the extent
the response did not impede the officials' other duties, (3) unique
facts made a response particularly time-consuming, and (4) the inmate
got all requested documents. Guy v. Lampert, 2016 WY 77, 376 P.3d 499,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. 2016).

Plaintiff's continued insistence on physically inspecting all of the sheriff's files seemed to arise from his concern that the sheriff was “hiding” something from him, but the Supreme Court could not grant him relief on that basis alone. Additionally, it did not appear that the relief plaintiff had requested was contemplated by the Public Records Act, although it was not necessary to resolve that issue. Williams v. Matheny, 2017 WY 85, 398 P.3d 521,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. 2017).

Federal law. —

The Wyoming Public Records Act, §

16-4-201

et seq., and the Federal Freedom of Information Act have a common objective, which is that disclosure, not secrecy, should prevail. Sublette County Rural Health Care Dist. v. Miley, 942 P.2d 1101,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 1997).

Provisions construed favoring disclosure. —

The Wyoming Public Records Act, §§

16-4-201

through

16-4-205

, will receive a liberal construction in favor of disclosure and against withholding, and exemptions will be construed narrowly. Sheridan Newspapers v. Sheridan, 660 P.2d 785,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1983); Sublette County Rural Health Care Dist. v. Miley, 942 P.2d 1101,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 1997).

Exemptions to public disclosure are to be construed narrowly.

Laramie River Conservation Council v. Dinger, 567 P.2d 731,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 276

(Wyo. 1977).

Blanket withdrawal of police logs and reports forbidden. —

The blanket withdrawal of the police rolling log and case reports from public inspection is violative of statutory and constitutional rights. Sheridan Newspapers v. Sheridan, 660 P.2d 785,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1983).

Tape of university committee meeting was a public record. —

Tape of a meeting of a committee regarding the misconduct of a university's former manager of transportation services should have been considered a public record because the university took possession of the tape in connection with an internal personnel investigation, which was subject to inspection by any member of the public absent the application of any statutory exemption.
Sheaffer v. State ex rel. Univ. of Wyo., 2006 WY 99, 139 P.3d 468,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 2006).

Stated

in

Houghton v. Franscell, 870 P.2d 1050,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1994).

Cited

in

Laramie County Sch. Dist. No. One v. Cheyenne Newspapers, 2011 WY 55, 250 P.3d 522,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Mar. 29, 2011).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Restricting public access to judicial records of state courts, 84 ALR3d 598.

Accused's right to discovery or inspection of “rap sheets” or similar police records about prosecution witnesses, Hill v. Superior Court of Los Angeles County (Cal. 1974), 10 Cal. 3d 812, 112 Cal. Rptr. 257, 518 P.2d 1353, 1974 Cal. LEXIS 364.

What are “records” of agency which must be made available under state freedom of information act, 27 ALR4th 680.

What constitutes an agency subject to application of state freedom of information act, 27 ALR4th 742.

State Freedom of Information Act requests: right to receive information in particular medium or format, 86 ALR4th 786.

Exhaustion of administrative remedies as prerequisite to judicial action to compel disclosure under state freedom of information acts, 114 ALR5th 283.

Construction and application of state freedom of information act provisions concerning award of attorney's fees and other litigation costs,118 ALR 5th 1.

Use of Freedom of Information Act (5 USC § 552) as substitute for, or as means of, supplementing discovery procedures available to litigants in federal civil, criminal, or administrative proceedings, 57 ALR Fed 903.

Power of court under 5 USC § 552(a)(4)(B) to examine agency records in camera to determine propriety of withholding records, 60 ALR Fed 416.

Waiver by federal government agency as affecting agency's right to claim exemption from disclosure requirements, under the Freedom of Information Act ( 5 USC § 552(b)), 67 ALR Fed 595.

What constitutes “final opinion” or “order” of federal administrative agency required to be made available for public inspection and copying within meaning of 5 U.S.C. § 552(a)(2)(A), 114 ALR Fed 287.

What is agency subject to Privacy Act provisions ( 5 U.S.C. § 552a), 150 ALR Fed 521.

What are “records” of agency which must be made available under Freedom of Information Act (5 USC § 552(a)(3)) 153 ALR Fed 571.